Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.120

Reimbursement of expenses for agents.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, an agent is entitled to reimbursement of expenses reasonably incurred on behalf of the principal and to reasonable compensation.

[ 2016 c 209 s 112.]